New Jersey, session 221, S3311.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   The Commissioner of Education, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Criminal Justice, shall develop an interscholastic sports sexual assault prevention training program for high school athletic directors and coaches.  The training program shall provide: (1)   instruction concerning the prevention of sexual assault and the identification of signs of sexual assault; and (2)   information concerning the services, including treatment, counseling, legal, and medical services, available to a victim of sexual assault in accordance with the standard protocols developed by the Attorney General pursuant to subsection d. of section 6 of P.L.1985, c.404 (C.52:4B-44). The commissioner shall update the training program as necessary to ensure that it reflects the most current information available on sexual assault prevention. b.    The New Jersey State Interscholastic Athletic Association shall require each person who coaches a public school district or nonpublic school interscholastic high school sport, and an athletic director who oversees a public school district or nonpublic school interscholastic high school sports program, to complete the training program established pursuant to subsection a. of this section every four years. Each newly appointed coach or athletic director shall initially complete the training program during the first year in that position. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.